District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.05

Accessibility.

An ALR that provides services for residents who use wheelchairs, shall insure that:

(1)

Doorways and hallways provide a clear opening of at least 32 inches; and

(2)

Thresholds exceeding 1/2 inch are modified to provide a 1:12 maximum slope.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1005, 47 DCR 2647
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 27(c), 59 DCR 5567
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “residents who use wheelchairs” for “wheelchair-bound residents” in the introductory language.
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.